test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lykata_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - lʼykätä: # Verb 'to throw / heittää, viskata, paiskata' - full paradigm
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:  lʼykkiän
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:  lʼykkiät
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  lʼykkiäy
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:  lʼykkiämmö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:  lʼykkiättö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  lʼykätäh
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lʼykkiä
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:  lʼykätä

      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:  lʼykkäin
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:  lʼykkäit
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  lʼykkäi
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:  lʼykkäimmö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:  lʼykkäittö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  lʼykättih
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: lʼykännyh
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: lʼykätty

      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg1:  lʼykkiäzin
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg2:  lʼykkiäzit
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg3:  lʼykkiäs
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl1:  lʼykkiäzimmö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl2:  lʼykkiäzittö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl3:  lʼykättäs
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: lʼykkiäs
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:  lʼykättäs

      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg1:  lʼykännyzin
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg2:  lʼykännyzit
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg3:  lʼykännys
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl1:  lʼykännyzimmö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl2:  lʼykännyzittö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl3:  lʼykätännys
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: lʼykännys
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3:  lʼykätännys

      lʼykätä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1:  lʼykännen
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Pot+Sg2:  lʼykännet
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Pot+Sg3:  lʼykännöy
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Pot+Pl1:  lʼykännemmö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Pot+Pl2:  lʼykännettö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Pot+Pl3:  lʼykätänneh
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg: lʼykänne
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg+Pl3:  lʼykätänne

      lʼykätä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:  lʼykkiä
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg3:  lʼykäkkäh
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl1:  lʼykäkkiämmö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:  [lʼykäkkiä, lʼykäkkiättö]
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:  lʼykättähes
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: lʼykkiä
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg3: lʼykäkkäh
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl1: lʼykäkkiämmö
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: lʼykäkkiä
      lʼykätä+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl3:  lʼykättähes


      lʼykätä+V+Inf: lʼykätä
      lʼykätä+V+Der/mine+Sg+Nom: lʼykkiämine
      lʼykätä+V+Der/mA+Inf+Ill: lʼykkiämäh
      lʼykätä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lʼykkiäjy
 
 
